Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑43] Personal and family
maintenance. (a) Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides,
language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to
personal and family maintenance shall authorize the agent to:

(1) Perform the acts necessary to maintain the
customary standard of living of the principal, the principal's spouse, and the
following individuals, whether living when the power of attorney is executed or
later born:

(A) The principal's children;

(B) Other individuals legally entitled to be
supported by the principal; and

(C) The individuals whom the principal has
customarily supported or indicated the intent to support;

(2) Make periodic payments of child support and other
family maintenance required by a court or governmental agency or an agreement
to which the principal is a party;

(3) Provide living quarters for the individuals
described in paragraph (1) by:

(A) Purchase, lease, or other contract; or

(B) Paying the operating costs, including
interest, amortization payments, repairs, improvements, and taxes, for premises
owned by the principal or occupied by those individuals;

(4) Provide normal domestic help, usual vacations and
travel expenses, and funds for shelter, clothing, food, appropriate education,
including postsecondary and vocational education, and other current living
costs for the individuals described in paragraph (1);

(5) Pay expenses for necessary health care and
custodial care on behalf of the individuals described in paragraph (1);

(6) Act as the principal's personal representative
pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, sections
1171 through 1179 of the Social Security Act, title 42 United States Code
section 1320d, as amended, and applicable regulations, in making decisions
related to the past, present, or future payment for the provision of health
care consented to by the principal or anyone authorized under the law of this
State to consent to health care on behalf of the principal;

(7) Continue any provision made by the principal for
automobiles or other means of transportation, including registering, licensing,
insuring, and replacing them, for the individuals described in paragraph (1);

(8) Maintain credit and debit accounts for the
convenience of the individuals described in paragraph (1) and open new
accounts; and

(9) Continue payments incidental to the membership or
affiliation of the principal in a religious institution, club, society, order,
or other organization or to continue contributions to those organizations.

(b) Authority with respect to personal and
family maintenance shall be neither dependent upon, nor limited by, authority
that an agent may or may not have with respect to gifts under this chapter. [L
2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next